Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6107YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2282 Section 1. Section 7.20, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 7.20 Executive order ââ use of vacant school property. 3 The governor shall issue an executive order requiring all 4 state agencies to consider the leasing of a vacant facility 5 or building which is appropriately located and which is owned 6 by a public school corporation before a state agency leases, 7 purchases, or constructs a facility or building. The state 8 agency may lease a facility or building owned by a public 9 school corporation with an option to purchase the facility 10 or building in compliance with section sections 297.22 and 11 297.22A . The lease shall provide that the public school 12 corporation may terminate the lease if the corporation needs to 13 use the facility or building for school purposes. The public 14 school corporation shall notify the state agency at least 15 thirty days before the termination of the lease. 16 Sec. 2. Section 278.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2026, 17 is amended to read as follows: 18 b. Except when restricted by section 297.24 or 297.25 , 19 direct the sale, lease, or other disposition of any schoolhouse 20 or school site or other property belonging to the corporation, 21 and the application to be made of the proceeds thereof. 22 However, this section shall not be construed to prevent the 23 sale, lease, exchange, gift, or grant and acceptance of any 24 interest in real or other property of the corporation to the 25 extent authorized in section 297.22 or , 297.22A, or 297.24 . 26 Sec. 3. Section 297.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 297.19 Public sale. 29 1. If the owner of the tract from which said site was taken 30 fails to pay the amount of such appraisement to such school 31 district within twenty days after the filing of same with 32 the county sheriff, the school district may sell , subject to 33 subsection 2, do any of the following: 34 a. Sell said site to any other person at the appraised 35 -1- LSB 6107YH (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2282 value , or may sell the same . 1 b. Sell said site at public sale to the highest bidder. 2 2. If said site contains a building or structure with 3 greater than or equal to two thousand five hundred square feet 4 of floor space, the school district shall not sell said site 5 unless the county board of supervisors of the county in which 6 said site is located approves such sale. 7 Sec. 4. Section 297.20, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 297.20 Sale of improvements. 10 1. If there are improvements on said site, the improvements 11 may, at the request of either party and subject to subsection 12 2 , be appraised and sold separately. 13 2. If the improvements on said site include a building 14 or structure with greater than or equal to two thousand five 15 hundred square feet of floor space, the school district shall 16 not sell the improvements on said site unless the county board 17 of supervisors of the county in which said site is located 18 approves such sale. 19 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 297.22A Approval for sale of certain 20 school buildings. 21 In addition to the requirements described in section 297.22, 22 subsection 1, paragraph âcâ , the board of directors of a school 23 district shall not sell a building or structure with greater 24 than or equal to two thousand five hundred square feet of floor 25 space unless the sale is approved by one of the following: 26 1. The city council of the city in which the building or 27 structure is located. 28 2. If the building or structure is situated wholly outside 29 of a city, the county board of supervisors of the county in 30 which the building or structure is located. 31 Sec. 6. Section 297.25, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 297.25 Rule of construction. 34 Section 297.22 shall be construed as independent of 35 -2- LSB 6107YH (3) 91 jda/jh 2/ 4 H.F. 2282 the power vested in the electors by section 278.1 , and 1 as additional to such power. If a board of directors has 2 exercised its independent power under section 297.22 regarding 3 the disposition of real or personal property of the school 4 district and has by resolution approved such action, the 5 electors may subsequently proceed to exercise their power under 6 section 278.1 for a purpose directly contrary to an action 7 previously approved by the board of directors in accordance 8 with section 297.22 or 297.22A . However, the electors shall 9 be limited to ten days after an action by the board to exercise 10 such power for a purpose directly contrary to the boardâs 11 action. 12 Sec. 7. Section 331.361, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 7. The board shall not lease, purchase, or construct a 15 facility or building before considering the leasing of a vacant 16 facility or building which is located in the county and owned 17 by a public school corporation. The board may lease a facility 18 or building owned by the public school corporation with an 19 option to purchase the facility or building in compliance 20 with section 297.22 or 297.22A . The lease shall provide that 21 the public school corporation may terminate the lease if the 22 corporation needs to use the facility or building for school 23 purposes. The public school corporation shall notify the board 24 at least thirty days before the termination of the lease. 25 Sec. 8. Section 364.21, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 364.21 Use of vacant school property. 28 A city shall not lease, purchase, or construct a building 29 before considering the leasing of a vacant facility or building 30 owned by a local public school corporation. The city may 31 lease a facility or building owned by a local public school 32 corporation with an option to purchase the facility or building 33 in compliance with section 297.22 or 297.22A . The lease shall 34 provide that the public school corporation may terminate the 35 -3- LSB 6107YH (3) 91 jda/jh 3/ 4 H.F. 2282 lease if the corporation needs to use the facility or building 1 for school purposes. The public school corporation shall 2 notify the city at least thirty days before the termination of 3 the lease. 4 Sec. 9. APPLICABILITY. This Act does not apply to sales of 5 real property, and agreements to sell real property, that are 6 effected or entered into prior to the effective date of this 7 Act. 8